Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [10.5801] HMONG HERITAGE WEEK. new text end new text begin (a) May 14 to May 20 each year is an official week of observance to commemorate the state's valued Hmong heritage. During the week of observance, all residents of the state are urged to: new text end new text begin (1) recognize and honor the history, culture, traditions, and heritage of the Hmong people; and new text end new text begin (2) acknowledge the contributions of Hmong people to Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) Hmong Heritage Week honors: new text end new text begin (1) the history, heritage, and resilience of the Hmong people, including their longstanding cultural traditions, their service and sacrifice alongside the United States during the Secret War in Laos, and their journey as refugees to the United States and Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (2) the significant contributions of Hmong Minnesotans in public service, entrepreneurship, agriculture, education, the arts, and community life and in enriching the cultural, civic, and economic fabric of the state. new text end new text begin (c) The governor is encouraged to issue a proclamation recognizing Hmong Heritage Week and encouraging Minnesotans to observe Hmong Heritage Week through programs, ceremonies, educational activities, and community events honoring the history, culture, traditions, and heritage of the Hmong people. new text end new text begin (d) Schools, libraries, historical societies, cultural institutions, nonprofit organizations, community groups, local governments, and residents are encouraged to organize and lead programs, ceremonies, educational initiatives, and community events that highlight the history, culture, traditions, resilience, and contributions of the Hmong people. new text end